Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:(1) No later than July 1, 2026, the community and technical colleges shall each adopt a policy concerning the percentage of courses that may be taught at each respective college by faculty without tenure track status. At minimum, the policy must require that no more than 45 percent of courses offered annually may be taught by faculty without tenure track status on and after July 1, 2030.(2) By July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the college board shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details the steps community and technical colleges have taken to meet the requirement established under subsection (1) of this section. The report must include the most recent calculated percentage of courses taught by faculty without tenure track status at each institution as well as any relevant data.(3) As used in this section, "tenure track status" means a probationary faculty employee having an opportunity to be reviewed for tenure or a faculty employee who has been awarded tenure.--- END ---